Illinois, session 104th, SB3672.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Local 5Government Digital Asset Investment Act. 6    Section 5. Purpose. The purpose of this Act is to 7authorize units of local government and other public agencies 8in the State of Illinois to invest a portion of their public 9funds in Bitcoin-related exchange-traded funds, stocks of 10companies holding significant digital assets, and Bitcoin 11bonds to promote economic diversification, innovation, and 12competitiveness in the digital economy. 13    Section 10. Definitions. For the purposes of this Act:14    "Bitcoin-related exchange-traded fund" means an 15exchange-traded fund listed on a national securities exchange 16that invests directly or indirectly in Bitcoin, including spot 17Bitcoin exchange-traded funds and Bitcoin futures 18exchange-traded funds.19    "Bitcoin bond" means a debt security issued by a 20government, corporation, or other entity, listed on a national 21securities exchange or approved by the U.S. Securities and 22Exchange Commission, where the principal or interest payments   SB3672- 2 -LRB104 20208 HLH 33659 b1are denominated in Bitcoin, combining the structure of 2traditional bonds with exposure to Bitcoin's value.3    "Digital asset stock" means equity securities of a 4publicly traded company that holds a substantial portion of 5its assets in Bitcoin or other digital currencies.6    "Public agency" has the meaning given to that term in the 7Public Funds Investment Act.8    "Public funds" means moneys held by a public agency. 9    Section 15. Reporting and oversight.10    (a) A public agency investing in Bitcoin-related 11exchange-traded funds, digital asset stocks, or Bitcoin bonds 12shall include a summary of the investments, including 13performance and allocation, in its annual financial report 14submitted to the Illinois Comptroller under the Governmental 15Account Audit Act.16    (b) Within 180 days after the effective date of this Act, 17the Comptroller may issue nonbinding guidance to assist public 18agencies in evaluating and reporting investments in 19Bitcoin-related exchange-traded funds, digital asset stocks, 20or Bitcoin bonds. 21    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 22severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 23    Section 200. The Public Funds Investment Act is amended by   SB3672- 3 -LRB104 20208 HLH 33659 b1changing Section 2 as follows: 2    (30 ILCS 235/2)  (from Ch. 85, par. 902)3    Sec. 2. Authorized investments. 4    (a) Any public agency may invest any public funds as 5follows:6        (1) in bonds, notes, certificates of indebtedness, 7    treasury bills or other securities now or hereafter 8    issued, which are guaranteed by the full faith and credit 9    of the United States of America as to principal and 10    interest;11        (2) in bonds, notes, debentures, or other similar 12    obligations of the United States of America, its agencies, 13    and its instrumentalities;14        (3) in interest-bearing savings accounts, 15    interest-bearing certificates of deposit or 16    interest-bearing time deposits or any other investments 17    constituting direct obligations of any bank as defined by 18    the Illinois Banking Act;19        (4) in short-term obligations of corporations 20    organized in the United States with assets exceeding 21    $500,000,000 if (i) such obligations are rated at the time 22    of purchase at one of the 3 highest classifications 23    established by at least 2 standard rating services and 24    which mature not later than 270 days from the date of 25    purchase, (ii) such purchases do not exceed 10% of the   SB3672- 4 -LRB104 20208 HLH 33659 b1    corporation's outstanding obligations, and (iii) no more 2    than one-third of the public agency's funds may be 3    invested in short-term obligations of corporations under 4    this paragraph (4);5        (4.5) in obligations of corporations organized in the 6    United States with assets exceeding $500,000,000 if (i) 7    such obligations are rated at the time of purchase at one 8    of the 3 highest classifications established by at least 2 9    standard rating services and which mature more than 270 10    days but less than 10 years from the date of purchase, (ii) 11    such purchases do not exceed 10% of the corporation's 12    outstanding obligations, and (iii) no more than one-third 13    of the public agency's funds may be invested in 14    obligations of corporations under this paragraph (4.5); or 15        (5) in money market mutual funds registered under the 16    Investment Company Act of 1940, provided that the 17    portfolio of any such money market mutual fund is limited 18    to obligations described in paragraph (1) or (2) of this 19    subsection and to agreements to repurchase such 20    obligations.21    (a-1) In addition to any other investments authorized 22under this Act, a municipality, park district, forest preserve 23district, conservation district, county, or other governmental 24unit may invest its public funds in interest bearing bonds of 25any county, township, city, village, incorporated town, 26municipal corporation, or school district, of the State of   SB3672- 5 -LRB104 20208 HLH 33659 b1Illinois, of any other state, or of any political subdivision 2or agency of the State of Illinois or of any other state, 3whether the interest earned thereon is taxable or tax-exempt 4under federal law. The bonds shall be registered in the name of 5the municipality, park district, forest preserve district, 6conservation district, county, or other governmental unit, or 7held under a custodial agreement at a bank. The bonds shall be 8rated at the time of purchase within the 4 highest general 9classifications established by a rating service of nationally 10recognized expertise in rating bonds of states and their 11political subdivisions.12    (b) Investments may be made only in banks which are 13insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation. Any 14public agency may invest any public funds in short term 15discount obligations of the Federal National Mortgage 16Association or in shares or other forms of securities legally 17issuable by savings banks or savings and loan associations 18incorporated under the laws of this State or any other state or 19under the laws of the United States. Investments may be made 20only in those savings banks or savings and loan associations 21the shares, or investment certificates of which are insured by 22the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation. Any such securities 23may be purchased at the offering or market price thereof at the 24time of such purchase. All such securities so purchased shall 25mature or be redeemable on a date or dates prior to the time 26when, in the judgment of such governing authority, the public   SB3672- 6 -LRB104 20208 HLH 33659 b1funds so invested will be required for expenditure by such 2public agency or its governing authority. The expressed 3judgment of any such governing authority as to the time when 4any public funds will be required for expenditure or be 5redeemable is final and conclusive. Any public agency may 6invest any public funds in dividend-bearing share accounts, 7share certificate accounts or class of share accounts of a 8credit union chartered under the laws of this State or the laws 9of the United States; provided, however, the principal office 10of any such credit union must be located within the State of 11Illinois. Investments may be made only in those credit unions 12the accounts of which are insured by applicable law.13    (c) For purposes of this Section, the term "agencies of 14the United States of America" includes: (i) the federal land 15banks, federal intermediate credit banks, banks for 16cooperative, federal farm credit banks, or any other entity 17authorized to issue debt obligations under the Farm Credit Act 18of 1971 (12 U.S.C. 2001 et seq.) and Acts amendatory thereto; 19(ii) the federal home loan banks and the federal home loan 20mortgage corporation; and (iii) any other agency created by 21Act of Congress.22    (d) Except for pecuniary interests permitted under 23subsection (f) of Section 3-14-4 of the Illinois Municipal 24Code or under Section 3.2 of the Public Officer Prohibited 25Practices Act, no person acting as treasurer or financial 26officer or who is employed in any similar capacity by or for a   SB3672- 7 -LRB104 20208 HLH 33659 b1public agency may do any of the following:2        (1) have any interest, directly or indirectly, in any 3    investments in which the agency is authorized to invest.4        (2) have any interest, directly or indirectly, in the 5    sellers, sponsors, or managers of those investments.6        (3) receive, in any manner, compensation of any kind 7    from any investments in which the agency is authorized to 8    invest.9    (e) Any public agency may also invest any public funds in a 10Public Treasurers' Investment Pool created under Section 17 of 11the State Treasurer Act. Any public agency may also invest any 12public funds in a fund managed, operated, and administered by 13a bank, subsidiary of a bank, or subsidiary of a bank holding 14company or use the services of such an entity to hold and 15invest or advise regarding the investment of any public funds.16    (f) To the extent a public agency has custody of funds not 17owned by it or another public agency and does not otherwise 18have authority to invest such funds, the public agency may 19invest such funds as if they were its own. Such funds must be 20released to the appropriate person at the earliest reasonable 21time, but in no case exceeding 31 days, after the private 22person becomes entitled to the receipt of them. All earnings 23accruing on any investments or deposits made pursuant to the 24provisions of this Act shall be credited to the public agency 25by or for which such investments or deposits were made, except 26as provided otherwise in Section 4.1 of the State Finance Act   SB3672- 8 -LRB104 20208 HLH 33659 b1or the Local Governmental Tax Collection Act, and except where 2by specific statutory provisions such earnings are directed to 3be credited to and paid to a particular fund.4    (g) A public agency may purchase or invest in repurchase 5agreements of government securities having the meaning set out 6in the Government Securities Act of 1986, as now or hereafter 7amended or succeeded, subject to the provisions of said Act 8and the regulations issued thereunder. The government 9securities, unless registered or inscribed in the name of the 10public agency, shall be purchased through banks or trust 11companies authorized to do business in the State of Illinois.12    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act, a public 13agency may invest up to 5% of its public funds in:14        (1) bitcoin-related exchange-traded funds listed on a 15    national securities exchange registered with the U.S. 16    Securities and Exchange Commission;17        (2) stocks of publicly traded companies listed on a 18    national securities exchange that hold at least 25% of 19    their total assets in Bitcoin or other digital currencies, 20    as verified by the company's most recent audited financial 21    statements; and22        (3) bitcoin bonds listed on a national securities 23    exchange or approved by the SEC, issued by a government, 24    corporation, or other entity, with principal or interest 25    payments denominated in Bitcoin.26    (h) Except for repurchase agreements of government   SB3672- 9 -LRB104 20208 HLH 33659 b1securities which are subject to the Government Securities Act 2of 1986, as now or hereafter amended or succeeded, no public 3agency may purchase or invest in instruments which constitute 4repurchase agreements, and no financial institution may enter 5into such an agreement with or on behalf of any public agency 6unless the instrument and the transaction meet the following 7requirements:8        (1) The securities, unless registered or inscribed in 9    the name of the public agency, are purchased through banks 10    or trust companies authorized to do business in the State 11    of Illinois.12        (2) An authorized public officer after ascertaining 13    which firm will give the most favorable rate of interest, 14    directs the custodial bank to "purchase" specified 15    securities from a designated institution. The "custodial 16    bank" is the bank or trust company, or agency of 17    government, which acts for the public agency in connection 18    with repurchase agreements involving the investment of 19    funds by the public agency. The State Treasurer may act as 20    custodial bank for public agencies executing repurchase 21    agreements. To the extent the Treasurer acts in this 22    capacity, he is hereby authorized to pass through to such 23    public agencies any charges assessed by the Federal 24    Reserve Bank.25        (3) A custodial bank must be a member bank of the 26    Federal Reserve System or maintain accounts with member   SB3672- 10 -LRB104 20208 HLH 33659 b1    banks. All transfers of book-entry securities must be 2    accomplished on a Reserve Bank's computer records through 3    a member bank of the Federal Reserve System. These 4    securities must be credited to the public agency on the 5    records of the custodial bank and the transaction must be 6    confirmed in writing to the public agency by the custodial 7    bank.8        (4) Trading partners shall be limited to banks or 9    trust companies authorized to do business in the State of 10    Illinois or to registered primary reporting dealers.11        (5) The security interest must be perfected.12        (6) The public agency enters into a written master 13    repurchase agreement which outlines the basic 14    responsibilities and liabilities of both buyer and seller.15        (7) Agreements shall be for periods of 330 days or 16    less.17        (8) The authorized public officer of the public agency 18    informs the custodial bank in writing of the maturity 19    details of the repurchase agreement.20        (9) The custodial bank must take delivery of and 21    maintain the securities in its custody for the account of 22    the public agency and confirm the transaction in writing 23    to the public agency. The Custodial Undertaking shall 24    provide that the custodian takes possession of the 25    securities exclusively for the public agency; that the 26    securities are free of any claims against the trading   SB3672- 11 -LRB104 20208 HLH 33659 b1    partner; and any claims by the custodian are subordinate 2    to the public agency's claims to rights to those 3    securities.4        (10) The obligations purchased by a public agency may 5    only be sold or presented for redemption or payment by the 6    fiscal agent bank or trust company holding the obligations 7    upon the written instruction of the public agency or 8    officer authorized to make such investments.9        (11) The custodial bank shall be liable to the public 10    agency for any monetary loss suffered by the public agency 11    due to the failure of the custodial bank to take and 12    maintain possession of such securities.13    (i) Notwithstanding the foregoing restrictions on 14investment in instruments constituting repurchase agreements 15the Illinois Housing Development Authority may invest in, and 16any financial institution with capital of at least 17$250,000,000 may act as custodian for, instruments that 18constitute repurchase agreements, provided that the Illinois 19Housing Development Authority, in making each such investment, 20complies with the safety and soundness guidelines for engaging 21in repurchase transactions applicable to federally insured 22banks, savings banks, savings and loan associations or other 23depository institutions as set forth in the Federal Financial 24Institutions Examination Council Policy Statement Regarding 25Repurchase Agreements and any regulations issued, or which may 26be issued by the supervisory federal authority pertaining   SB3672- 12 -LRB104 20208 HLH 33659 b1thereto and any amendments thereto; provided further that the 2securities shall be either (i) direct general obligations of, 3or obligations the payment of the principal of and/or interest 4on which are unconditionally guaranteed by, the United States 5of America or (ii) any obligations of any agency, corporation 6or subsidiary thereof controlled or supervised by and acting 7as an instrumentality of the United States Government pursuant 8to authority granted by the Congress of the United States and 9provided further that the security interest must be perfected 10by either the Illinois Housing Development Authority, its 11custodian or its agent receiving possession of the securities 12either physically or transferred through a nationally 13recognized book entry system.14    (j) In addition to all other investments authorized under 15this Section, a community college district may invest public 16funds in any mutual funds that invest primarily in corporate 17investment grade or global government short term bonds. 18Purchases of mutual funds that invest primarily in global 19government short term bonds shall be limited to funds with 20assets of at least $100 million and that are rated at the time 21of purchase as one of the 10 highest classifications 22established by a recognized rating service. The investments 23shall be subject to approval by the local community college 24board of trustees. Each community college board of trustees 25shall develop a policy regarding the percentage of the 26college's investment portfolio that can be invested in such   SB3672- 13 -LRB104 20208 HLH 33659 b1funds.2    (k) In addition to all other investments authorized under 3this Section, a public agency may adopt an ordinance or 4resolution to allow for investment of public funds in other 5instruments not specifically listed in this Section provided 6that those investments comply with (i) any other law that 7authorizes public agencies to invest funds and (ii) the 8investment policy adopted by the public agency under Section 92.5 of this Act. 10    Nothing in this Section shall be construed to authorize an 11intergovernmental risk management entity to accept the deposit 12of public funds except for risk management purposes.13(Source: P.A. 102-285, eff. 8-6-21; 103-880, eff. 1-1-25.)